South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4636.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The General Assembly finds that: (1) kratom contains psychoactive substances acting on opioid receptors, which are not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration; (2) the use of kratom is associated with addiction, liver injury, seizures, and deaths; and (3) kratom poses a significant threat to public health. SECTION 2.  Section 44-53-190 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (G) Kratom and any salt, sulfate, isomer, homologue, analogue, or other preparation of kratom, and any salt, isomer, compound, derivative, precursor, homologue, analogue, or other preparation thereof, synthetic or otherwise, that is substantially chemically equivalent or identical to kratom. For purposes of this item, "kratom" means any part of the tropical evergreen plant mitragyna speciosa. SECTION 3.  Article 20, Chapter 53, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect six months after approval by the Governor. ----XX----